en: Sourdough baguettes, French baguette with yeast
da: Surdejsbaguetter
fr: Baguettes au levain, Baguette de pain au levain, Baguette au levain
sv: Surdegsbaguetter

en: Gluten-free baguettes
da: Glutenfrie baguetter
sv: Glutenfria baguetter

en: Mini baguettes
da: Minibaguetter
fi: Minipatongit
sv: Minibaguetter

en: Gluten-free mini baguettes
da: Glutenfrie minibaguetter
sv: Glutenfria minibaguetter

en: Breads with T80 to T110 flour, Brown bread baguette with flour type 80, Brown bread baguette with flour type 110, Brown bread ball with flour type 80, Brown bread ball with flour type 110
fr: Pains à la farine de T80 à T110, Baguettes de pain à la farine T80, Baguettes de pain à la farine T110, Boules de pain à la farine T80, Boules de pain à la farine T110

en: Breads with seeds, French bread multigrain from bakery, French bread baguette multigrain from bakery, French bread ball multigrain from bakery
fr: Pains au graines, Pain artisanal aux céréales et graines, Baguette artisanale aux céréales et graines, Boule de pain artisanale aux céréales et graines

en: Bread crumbs, breadcrumbs
ar: بقسماط
be: Паніровачныя сухары
bg: Галета
ca: farina de galeta
cs: strouhanka
da: Rasp
de: Paniermehl, Panur, Semmelbrösel
el: ψίχουλα ψωμιού
eo: raspaĵo
es: pan rallado
eu: Ogi birrindu
fa: آرد سوخاری
fi: Korppujauho
fr: Chapelure, panure, Chapelures
gl: Pan relado
he: פירורי לחם
hr: Krušne mrvice
id: Tepung roti
io: Raspo-pano
it: pangrattato
ja: パン粉, パンこ
ko: 빵가루
lt: Malti džiūvėsiai
nb: Strøkavring
nl: paneermeel, Paneermelen
pl: Bułka tarta, Panierka
pt: pão ralado
ru: Панировочные сухари
sk: Strúhanka
sv: panering, Ströbröd
uk: Паніровка
vi: Vụn bánh mì
zh: 麵包屑

en: Wheat crumbs
de: Weizen Semmelbrösel, Weizen Paniermehl
es: Pan rallado de trigo
fr: chapelure de blé
hr: Pšenične mrvice
it: Briciole di grano
nl: Graanpaneermelen, Graanpaneermeel

en: Panko
xx: Panko
de: Panko, Panko-Mehl
es: Panko
fr: Panko
hr: Panko
nl: Panko

en: Bread loaves, Bread loaf, Loaf of bread
is: Hleifur
ru: Буха́нка
sv: Brödlimpor, Limpor, Limpa
yi: לאַבן

en: Bread rolls, Buns, rolls
af: Broodrolletjie
da: Rundstykker
de: Brötchen, Semmeln
eo: Bulkoj
fi: Sämpylät
fr: Petits pains, Buns (petits pains)
hr: Buns
it: Panini inglesi
ja: ロールパン
lt: Bandelės
nl: Broodjes
pl: Bułka
sv: Bullar
zh: 圆面包, 圓麵包

en: Soft bread rolls
da: Boller
nl: Zachte broodjes, puntjes, bollen

en: Breadsticks, Grissini, Bread sticks
ar: إصبع الخبز
bg: Гризини
ca: Bastonet de pa
da: Grissini
de: Brotstangen, Grissini
el: Κριτσίνι
eo: Grisino
es: Colines, Grisín
et: Grissini
eu: Ogi mehe
fa: نان سوپ
fi: Leipätikut, Grissini
fr: Gressins, Gressin
hr: Grisini
hu: Grissino
io: Bastonpano
it: Grissini, Grissino
ja: グリッシーニ
jv: Roti stik
ko: 막대빵
lt: Duonos lazdelės
lv: Grisīni
mk: Стапчиња леб
ms: Roti batang
nb: Grissini
nl: Soepstengels, Soepstengel
pl: Grissini
pt: Gressino
ro: Grisină
ru: Гриссини
sl: Grisin
sr: Грисине
sv: Grissini
tr: Grissini
uk: Грісіні
vi: Bánh mì que
zh: 面包棒

en: Wholemeal breads, Brown breads, Wholemeal bread made with flour type 150, Integral bread made with flour type 150
bg: Пълнозърнест хляб
da: Fuldkornsbrød
de: Vollkornbrote, Vollkornbrot
es: Panes integrales, Pan integral
fi: Tummat leivät
fr: Pains complets, pain complet, Pain complet à la farine T150, Pain intégral à la farine T150
hr: Integralni kruhovi
it: Pani integrali
lt: Pilno grūdo duonos
nl: Bruine broden, Bruinbrood, Bruin brood, Volkoren broden
ro: Pâine brună, Pâine neagră
ru: Цельнозерновой хлеб

en: Sourdough breads
da: Surdejsbrød
fr: Pains au levain
sv: Surdegsbröd

en: Crispbreads
da: Knækbrød
de: Knäckebrote, Knäckebrot
fr: Pains croustillants, Pain croustillant
hr: Hrskavi kruhovi
nb: Knekkebrød
nl: Knäckebröd, Knäckebrot
nn: Knekkebrød
pl: Pieczywo chrupkie
sv: Knäckebröd

en: Crispbreads (wholemeal), Crispbreads(wholemeal)
da: Fuldkornsknækbrød, Knækbrød (fuldkorn)
fr: Pains croustillants complets
nl: Knäckebrot (volkoren)
sv: Fullkornsknäckebröd, Knäckebröd (fullkorn)

en: Crispbreads (non-wholemeal), Crispbreads(non-wholemeal)
da: Knækbrød (ikke-fuldkorn)
fr: Pains croustillants non-complets
nl: Knäckebrot (niet-volkoren)
sv: Knäckebröd (icke-fullkorn)

en: Extruded crispbreads
de: Knusperbrote, Knusperbrot
es: Tostadas ligeras crujientes
fi: näkkileivät
fr: Tartines craquantes extrudées, Tartines craquantes, tartine craquante, tartines croustillantes, tartine croustillante
hr: Ekstrudirani hrskavi kruhovi
lt: Džiūvesėliai
nl: Knapperige broodproducten

en: Extruded and grilled crispbread
fr: Tartines craquantes grillées, Tartines craquantes extrudées et grillées